Utah statutes.
17D-1-203.   Initiating the process to create a special service district.
(1)  The process to create a special service district is initiated by:
(a)  the legislative body of a county or municipality that proposes to create
a special service district adopting a resolution that:
(i)  declares that the public health, convenience, and necessity require the
creation of a special service district;
(ii)  indicates the legislative body's intent to create a special service
district; and
(iii)  complies with the requirements of Subsection (3); or
(b)  the filing of a petition that:
(i)  proposes the creation of a special service district;
(ii)  complies with the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3); and
(iii)  is filed with the legislative body of the county or municipality in
whose boundary the proposed special service district is located.
(2)  Each petition under Subsection (1)(b) shall:
(a)  be signed by:
(i)  the owners of at least 10% of the taxable value of taxable property
within the proposed special service district; or
(ii)  at least 10% of the registered voters residing within the proposed
special service district; and
(b)  indicate:
(i)  the residence address of each person who signs the petition; and
(ii)  if the person signs the petition as a property owner, the address or
other description of the person's property sufficient to identify the
property.
(3)  Each resolution under Subsection (1)(a) and petition under Subsection
(1)(b) shall:
(a)  describe the boundaries of the proposed special service district;
(b)  specify each service that the special service district is proposed to
provide; and
(c)  designate a name for the proposed special service district.
